Louisiana, session 2026, HB395.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:173.2 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§173.2. School mental health professionals; recruitment and retention program
A. The state Department of Education shall create an incentive program for
the purpose of recruiting, hiring, and retaining qualified mental health professionals
to work in public elementary and secondary schools. Such professionals shall
include counselors, social workers, school psychologists, and other behavioral health
specialists.
B. Through the administration of the program, the department shall make
every effort to meet or exceed a ratio of one mental health professional per two
hundred fifty students across all public schools in Louisiana.
Section 2. The provisions of Section 1 of this Act shall become effective when an
Act of the Louisiana Legislature containing a specific appropriation of monies for the
implementation of the provisions of this Act becomes effective.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1035 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 395